Washington statutes.
RCW 35.69.040

Abutting property defined.

For the purposes of this chapter all property having a frontage upon the sides or margins of any street shall be deemed to be abutting property, and such property shall be chargeable, as provided herein, for all costs of construction or reconstruction or any form of sidewalk improvement between the margin of said street and the roadway lying in front of and adjacent to said property.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.69.040. Prior: 1927 c 203 s 4; RRS s 9332-4.]